Maryland, session 2026, HB0437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
SUBTITLE 9. MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECTS.
2–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT” MEANS THE MEASUREMENT OF A
GIVEN WEIGHT OF A GREENHOUSE GAS THAT HAS THE SAME GLOBAL WARMING
POTENTIAL, MEASURED OVER A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME, AS 1 METRIC TON OF
CARBON DIOXIDE.
(C) “GREENHOUSE GAS” INCLUDES CARBON DIOXIDE, METHANE, NITROUS
OXIDE, HYDROFLUOROCARBONS, PERFLUOROCARBONS, AND SULFUR
HEXAFLUORIDE.
(D) “GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS” MEANS EMISSIONS OF GREENHOUSE
GASES IN THE STATE, MEASURED IN METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE
EQUIVALENTS.
(E) “IMPACT ASSESSMENT” MEANS AN ASSESSMENT OF A PROJECT’S OR
PROGRAM’S OPERATIONAL IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE
MILES TRAVELED.
(F) “INDUCED DEMAND” MEANS AN INCREASE IN THE DEMAND FOR MOTOR
VEHICLE TRAVEL THAT IS DEMONSTRATED BY AN INCREASE IN VEHICLE MILES
TRAVELED DUE TO AN INCREASE IN ROADWAY SUPPLY, SUCH AS NEW OR EXPANDED
ROADS, ADDITIONAL CAPACITY, OR ADDITIONAL LANE MILES.
(G) “MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–103.1 OF
THIS TITLE.
(H) “MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT” MEANS A MAJOR
CAPITAL PROJECT THAT:

HOUSE BILL 437 3
(1) THROUGH ALL PHASES INCREASES HIGHWAY CAPACITY
THROUGH NEW HIGHWAY LANES, GRADE SEPARATIONS INCLUDING INTERCHANGES,
OR EXTENDED HIGHWAY LANES; AND
(2) HAS A TOTAL COST THAT EXCEEDS $100,000,000.
(I) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–701
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(J) “SYSTEM PRESERVATION ACTIVITY” MEANS AN ACTIVITY FOCUSED ON
MAINTAINING AND REHABILITATING EXISTING TRANSPORTATION
INFRASTRUCTURE TO ENSURE THE INFRASTRUCTURE REMAINS SAFE, RELIABLE,
AND FUNCTIONAL.
(K) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(L) “VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA” MEANS THE TOTAL NUMBER
OF ON–ROAD MILES TRAVELED BY VEHICLES IN A GEOGRAPHIC REGION OVER A
1–YEAR PERIOD DIVIDED BY THE POPULATION IN THAT REGION.
2–902.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION
PROJECT THAT, ON:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026:
(1) (I) WAS A PART OF THE STATEWIDE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM THAT RECEIVED FUNDING FOR CONSTRUCTION;
(2) (II) WAS FUNDED FOR CONSTRUCTION IN THE CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM; OR
(3) (III) COMPLETED THE ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW PROCESS
UNDER THE NATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL POLICY ACT; OR
(2) INCLUDES THE CONSTRUCTION OR RECONSTRUCTION OF THE
WILLIAM PRESTON LANE, JR. MEMORIAL CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE AND
PARALLEL CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE INCLUDING ANY RELATED CONSTRUCTION
OR RECONSTRUCTION OF U.S. ROUTE 50 BETWEEN INTERSTATE 97 AND MARYLAND
ROUTE 404.

HOUSE BILL 437
2–903.
(A) AS PART OF THE PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTATION OF A MAJOR
HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PERFORM AN
IMPACT ASSESSMENT OF THE PROJECT AND DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A
CORRESPONDING MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM.
(B) (1) DURING PROJECT DEVELOPMENT, THE MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL IDENTIFY INVESTMENTS IN TRANSIT, TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT,
TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT, PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE FACILITIES,
LAND USE CHANGES, AND OTHER ACTIVITIES SPECIFIED IN § 2–904(C) OF THIS
SUBTITLE TO OFFSET THE INCREASE IN GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED
WITH THE PROJECT.
(2) THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL FOCUS ON
AREAS IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER OF PRIORITY:
(I) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT;
(II) AREAS WITHIN OR ASSOCIATED WITH AT LEAST ONE OF THE
COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE PROJECT;
(III) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES ACROSS THE STATE;
(IV) THE REGION IN WHICH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY
EXPANSION PROJECT IS LOCATED; AND
(V) THE STATE AT LARGE.
(C) (1) THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL OFFSET
THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY
CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT.
(2) THE NET GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM THE PROJECT AND
ITS ASSOCIATED MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL BE ZERO OR A
NEGATIVE NUMBER.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER BOTH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY
CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT AND THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM AS PART OF ITS EVALUATION OF THE PROJECT UNDER § 2–103.7 OF THIS
TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 437 5
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) FUND ELEMENTS OF THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM CONCURRENTLY WITH FUNDING FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE MAJOR
HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT; OR
(2) DEFER THE MAJOR HIGHWAY EXPANSION CAPACITY PROJECT
UNTIL THE PROJECT MEETS THE OFFSETTING REQUIREMENTS FOR A MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
2–904.
(A) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2033 AND IN EACH
ANNUAL RELEASE THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EVALUATE MAJOR
CAPITAL PROJECTS INCLUDED IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR THEIR IMPACT ON:
(I) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS; AND
(II) VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA.
(2) THE EVALUATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PUBLISHED FOR THE DRAFT CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM BY OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, AND WITH THE FINAL
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM EACH YEAR.
(B) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2033 AND IN EACH
ANNUAL RELEASE THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACHIEVE, TO THE
MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND SUBJECT TO STATE APPROPRIATIONS, A
PROGRAM WHOSE IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND PROGRESS
TOWARD ACHIEVING GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION TARGETS ARE, OVER THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM PERIOD, CONSISTENT WITH THE
PROJECTED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION REDUCTIONS MODELED FOR ROADS IN
MARYLAND’S CLIMATE POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN: MODELING APPENDIX.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL FUND OFFSETTING ACTIVITIES TO
MAKE THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM MORE CONSISTENT WITH
THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION REDUCTION GOALS UNDER THE DEPARTMENT’S
2023 CLIMATE POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN AND THE TARGETS ESTABLISHED IN
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 437
(C) THE OFFSETTING ACTIVITIES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND
(B) OF THIS SECTION ARE ACTIVITIES THAT:
(1) DEMONSTRABLY CREATE CONSISTENT, LONG–TERM REDUCTIONS
IN GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS OR VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED;
(2) PRIORITIZE OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
(3) ARE ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(4) INCLUDE:
(I) PARKING REDUCTION INITIATIVES;
(II) ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION;
(III) TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES;
(IV) LOW–TRAVEL–DEMAND COMMERCIAL AND RESIDENTIAL
DEVELOPMENT AND OTHER LAND USE CHANGES;
(V) ROADWAY PRICING;
(VI) TELECOMMUTING;
(VII) PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE IMPROVEMENTS AND
EXPANSION;
(VIII) MICRO–MOBILITY, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF
ADAPTIVE AND INCLUSIVE LOW SPEED VEHICLES FOR PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES;
(IX) ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION AND PEDESTRIAN
IMPROVEMENTS FOR PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES;
(X) SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION ON PROPERTY CONTROLLED
BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(XI) OTHER ACTIVITIES IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO
REDUCE VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED.
(D) TO ACHIEVE THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SET:

HOUSE BILL 437 7
(1) ANNUAL STATEWIDE DECLINING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION
REDUCTION TARGETS THAT INCORPORATE ASSUMPTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF
ELECTRIC VEHICLES IN THE STATE; AND
(2) ANNUAL REGIONAL DECLINING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION
REDUCTION TARGETS THAT:
(I) ARE SET AT AN AMOUNT THAT WHEN MET AND TAKEN
COLLECTIVELY FOR ALL REGIONS WOULD ACHIEVE THE REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED
IN § 2–903(C)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE STATEWIDE TARGETS SET UNDER ITEM
(1) OF THIS ITEM; AND
(II) INCORPORATE ASSUMPTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLES IN THE STATE.
(E) IN EVALUATING THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM’S
IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH THE BASELINE TOTAL GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO SURFACE TRANSPORTATION IN THE STATE FOR THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM PERIOD;
(2) CONSIDER THE DIRECT AND INDUCED DEMAND IMPACTS OF
MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECTS ON VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA AND
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS;
(3) CONSIDER THE DIRECT CLIMATE BENEFITS OF INVESTMENTS IN:
(I) TRANSIT OPERATIONS, INCLUDING LOCALLY OPERATED
TRANSIT SYSTEMS;
(II) TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING LAND DEVELOPMENT
DESIGNED TO REDUCE TRAVEL DEMAND;
(III) PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE INFRASTRUCTURE;
(IV) ELECTRIFICATION OF STATE VEHICLES;
(V) VEHICLE CHARGING INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(VI) SOLAR ENERGY GENERATION ON PROPERTY CONTROLLED
BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 437
(4) COMPARE THE PROJECTED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS TO THE
TARGET EMISSIONS ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
ACHIEVES THE EMISSIONS TARGETS.
(F) IN EVALUATING WHETHER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM MEETS GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION GOALS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT
CONSIDER STATE OF GOOD REPAIR ACTIVITIES AND ACTIVITIES THAT ARE SOLELY
SYSTEM PRESERVATION ACTIVITIES.
2–905.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO PERFORM CAPACITY EXPANSION
IMPACT ASSESSMENTS;
(2) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR CONSIDERING PROGRESS MADE
TOWARD MEETING THE TARGETS SPECIFIED IN § 2–904(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR DEVELOPING A MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING A
METHOD FOR CONSIDERING THE DIRECT AND INDUCED DEMAND IMPACTS OF A
MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT; AND
(4) PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE:
(I) THE PROCESSES ESTABLISHED UNDER ITEMS (2) AND (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) ANY MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
DEVELOPED UNDER § 2–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOCATE FUNDING
FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION AND DEVELOPMENT OF STATEWIDE AND REGIONAL
TRAVEL DEMAND MODELING RELATED TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING INDUCED DEMAND AND LAND USE EFFECTS FROM TRANSPORTATION
INVESTMENTS.
8–102.
(a) It is the policy of this title to promote an efficient and economical
transportation system.

HOUSE BILL 437 9
(b) The Department [of Transportation] and the [State Highway] Administration
may not proceed to the final project planning phase unless it has been determined that the
objective of the proposed project cannot be reasonably achieved through:
(1) Improvements in highway maintenance and safety;
(2) Projects that modify existing highways but provide for minimal
relocation or new highway construction; and
(3) Improvements in, or adoption of, transit alternatives, including mass
transit alternatives.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ISSUE A REPORT
PRIOR TO PROCEEDING TO THE FINAL PROJECT PLANNING PHASE THAT
DOCUMENTS:
(1) THE EVALUATION OF THE ALTERNATIVES IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) A DETERMINATION THROUGH OTHER REQUIRED PLANNING
DOCUMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.